Georgia, session 2025_26, HB234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 7 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to income taxes,
is amended by adding a new paragraph to subsection (a) of Code Section 48-7-27, relating
to computation of taxable net income, to read as follows:
"(11.3) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and ending on or before
December 31, 2030, income received by a commercial pilot, aircraft mechanic, or aircraft
service technician as a sign-on bonus or retention bonus for service as a commercial pilot,
aircraft mechanic, or aircraft service technician in this state;"
H. B. 234
- 1 -

LC 50 1012
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval and shall be applicable to tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 234
- 2 -